Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF489.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2033YH (3) 91 lh/ko H.F. 489 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 135.194 Pediatric cancer research 1 ââ appropriation. 2 For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and for each 3 fiscal year thereafter, there is appropriated from the general 4 fund of the state to the state board of regents a dollar amount 5 equal to the population of the state on July 1 of the same 6 fiscal year, according to the annual population estimate of the 7 United States census bureau, to be used for pediatric cancer 8 research at the university of Iowa hospitals and clinics. The 9 state board of regents shall report to the governor and the 10 general assembly by October 1 of each year on the expenditure 11 of the moneys in the prior fiscal year. 12